tr: Kaydırak kullanım parmağı: İşaret parmağı; Orta parmak; Geçerli değil (ton çubuğu); Serçe parmak; Yüzük parmağı; Başparmak; Diğer
en: Slide intended finger: Index finger; Middle finger; Not applicable (tone bar); Pinky; Ring finger; Thumb; Other
sv: Slide – fingerposition: Pekfinger; Långfinger; Ej tillämpligt (tonstav); Lillfinger; Ringfinger; Tumme; Övrigt
fi: Slideputken käyttö: Etusormi; Keskisormi; Ei sovellu (tone bar); Pikkusormi; Nimetön; Peukalo; Muu
vi: Trượt ngón tay dự định: Ngón trỏ; Ngón giữa; Không áp dụng (thanh tạo âm); Ngón út; Ngón áp út; Ngón cái; Khác
pt-PT: Dedo para o qual a corrediça se destina: Dedo indicador; Dedo médio; Não aplicável (barra de tom); Dedo mindinho; Dedo anelar; Polegar; Outro
th: เลื่อนนิ้วที่ต้องการ: นิ้วชี้; นิ้วกลาง; ไม่ระบุ (โทนบาร์); นิ้วก้อย; นิ้วนาง; นิ้วหัวแม่มือ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Predvideni prst za drsnik: Kazalec; Sredinec; Ni primerno (tonski drsnik); Mezinec; Prstanec; Palec; Drugo
bg-BG: Посочва за кой пръст е предназначен слайдът: Показалец; Среден пръст; Неприложимо (тонбар); Кутре; Безименен пръст; Палец; Друг
fr: Doigt qui porte le slide: Index; Majeur; Non applicable (barre de ton / tone bar); Auriculaire; Annulaire; Pouce; Autre
el: Προοριζόμενο δάχτυλο για slide: Δείκτης; Μεσαίο δάχτυλο; Δεν ισχύει (μπάρα τόνου - tone bar); Μικρό δάχτυλο; Παράμεσος; Αντίχειρας; Άλλο
zh-TW: 滑片適用手指: 食指; 中指; 不適用 (滑音管); 小指; 無名指; 拇指; 其他
es: Deslice el dedo deseado: Dedo índice; Dedo medio; No corresponde (barra de tono); Dedo meñique; Dedo anular; Pulgar; Otro
pt-BR: Slide dedo indicado: Dedo indicador; Dedo médio; Não aplicável (barra de tom); Dedo mindinho; Dedo anelar; Polegar; Outro
cs: Zamýšlený prst pro slajd: Ukazováček; Prostředníček; Nelze použít (tone bar); Malíček; Prsteníček; Palec; Jiný
da: Tilsigtet finger for slide: Pegefinger; Langefinger; Ikke relevant (tonestang); Lillefinger; Ringfinger; Tommelfinger; Andet
ro-RO: Deget vizat pentru culisă: Degetul arătător; Degetul mijlociu; Nu se aplică (bară de ton); Degetul mic; Degetul inelar; Degetul mare; Altul
ru: Предназначенный палец для слайда: Указательный палец; Средний палец; Неприменимо (тон-бар); Мизинец; Безымянный палец; Большой палец; Другое
sk-SK: Nasaďte na určený prst: Ukazovák; Prostredník; Neaplikovateľné (tónová tyčinka); Malíček; Prstenník; Palec; Iné
it: Dito previsto per lo slide: Dito indice; Dito medio; Non applicabile (tone bar); Mignolo; Anulare; Pollice; Altro
zh-CN: 滑棒适用手指: 食指; 中指; 不适用（音棒）; 小指; 无名指; 拇指; 其他
hr-HR: Željeni prst za klizač: Kažiprst; Srednji prst; Nije primjenjivo (tonski umetak/tone bar); Mali prst; Prstenjak; Palac; Ostalo
hu: Slide-gyűrűhöz ajánlott ujj: Mutatóujj; Középső ujj; Nem alkalmazható (hangrúd); Kisujj; Gyűrűsujj; Hüvelykujj; Egyéb
nb: Skyv den tiltenkte fingeren: Pekefinger; Langefinger; Ikke aktuelt (tonestang); Lillefinger; Ringfinger; Tommel; Annet
ja: スライド装着指: 人差し指; 中指; 該当なし (トーンバー); 小指; 薬指; 親指; その他
lt-LT: Slaidui skirtas pirštas: Smilius; Didysis pirštas; Netaikoma (tonų juosta); Mažasis pirštas; Bevardis pirštas; Nykštys; Kita
ko: 슬라이드 착용 손가락: 검지; 중지; 해당 없음(톤 바); 새끼손가락; 약지; 엄지; 기타
nl: Slide bedoelde vinger: Wijsvinger; Middelvinger; Niet van toepassing (tonebar); Pink; Ringvinger; Duim; Overig
pl: Docelowy palec slide’u: Palec wskazujący; Palec środkowy; Nie dotyczy (tone bar); Mały palec; Palec serdeczny; Kciuk; Inne
de: Vorgesehener Finger für den Slide: Zeigefinger; Mittelfinger; Nicht zutreffend (Tone Bar); Kleiner Finger; Ringfinger; Daumen; Andere